Washington statutes.
RCW 21.20.290

Stop order prohibited if facts known on effective date of statement.

The director may not enter a stop order against an effective registration statement on the basis of a fact or transaction known to the director when the registration statement became effective.

[ 1979 ex.s. c 68 s 18; 1959 c 282 s 29.]